Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB845.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Title 30 of the Pennsylvania Consolidated Statutes is amended by adding a section to read:§ 5127. Prevention of electric shock, electrocution or injuries to users of marinas and docks.(a) Compliance.--All boat dock operators and marina operators shall comply with the following requirements to aid in preventing electric shock, electrocution or injury to the users of the facilities and the surrounding areas of a boat dock or marina:(1) Any main overcurrent protective device, installed or replaced on or after July 1, 2025, that feeds a marina shall have ground-fault protection not exceeding 100 milliamperes. 123456789101112131415161718 Ground-fault protection not exceeding 100 milliamperes of each individual branch or feeder circuit shall be permitted as a suitable alternative. Each marina operator may determine the devices that the marina will utilize to achieve the 100-milliamperes limit that is required by this paragraph, including, but not limited to, the use of equipment leakage circuit interrupters or ground fault circuit interrupters.(2) Provide for a safety inspection between January 1, 2025, and December 31, 2025, and each year thereafter, by a licensed or certified electrician. The inspection shall include a review of all sources of electric supply, including ship-to-shore power pedestals, submergible pumps and sewage pump-out facilities, that could result in unsafe electrical current in the water for the purpose of ensuring compliance with the standards for maintenance of electrical wiring and equipment that are applicable to the marina. In the event that a deficiency is found during a safety inspection, any subsequent inspection that is required for the inspection of repairs that are made to address the deficiency shall be conducted by a licensed or certified electrician.(3) Install permanent safety signage with print legible at 80 feet of distance and placed to give adequate notice to persons using the boat dock or marina, or swimming area near the boat dock or marina, of the electric shock hazard risks of the waters around the boat dock or marina. The signage shall state:ELECTRIC SHOCK HAZARD RISK: NO SWIMMING WITHIN 100 YARDS OF THE BOAT DOCK(b) Definitions.--As used in this section, the following words and phrases shall have the meanings given to them in this 20250SB0845PN0932 - 2 - 123456789101112131415161718192021222324252627282930 subsection unless the context clearly indicates otherwise:"Boat dock." A man-made structure that protrudes into a body of water for the purpose of mooring a boat or for other water-related recreation, including boat liveries, and that is connected to an electric power source in any manner if the structure does not include structures that are privately owned and used exclusively by the owner or the owner's guests for noncommercial purposes."Boat dock operator" or "marina operator." Any person, whether the owner or not, supervising or responsible for the operation, maintenance or repair of a boat dock or marina subject to this part."Marina." A dock, including a boat dock or basin providing moorings for watercraft and boat houses and offering supply, repair or other services, including electric power source, for remuneration. The term does not include structures that are privately owned and used exclusively by the owner or the owner's guests for noncommercial purposes."Person." An individual, partnership, firm, corporation, association or other legal entity."Vessel." Any watercraft, other than a seaplane on the water, designed and used primarily for navigation or transportation on the water."Watercraft." A vessel that is propelled by machinery, whether or not the machinery is the principal source of propulsion. The term does not include a vessel owned or operated by the Federal Government, the Commonwealth or any department, agency or political subdivision of the Commonwealth.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.20250SB0845PN0932 - 3 - 1234567891011121314151617181920212223242526272829